Utah statutes.
76-2-104.   Culpable mental state -- Higher mental states included.

(1) If acting with criminal negligence is sufficient to establish the culpable mental state for an element of an offense, that element is also established if a person acts intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly.

(2)  If acting recklessly is sufficient to establish the culpable mental state for an element of an offense, that element is also established if a person acts intentionally or knowingly.

(3)  If acting knowingly is sufficient to establish the culpable mental state for an element of an offense, that element is also established if a person acts intentionally.



Amended by Chapter 75, 1998 General Session

